New York, session 2025-2026, S2624.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 121 of the family court act, as amended by chapter 2 204 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 121. Number of judges. The family court within the city of New York 4 shall consist of sixty-seven judges, effective January first, two thou- 5 sand twenty-five. There shall be at least one family court judge resi- 6 dent in each county of the city of New York; provided, however, that 7 there shall be at least three family court judge residents in the county 8 of Richmond. 9 § 2. Subdivision 2-b of section 102-a of the New York city civil court 10 act, as added by chapter 204 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 11 follows: 12 2-b. [Twelve additional] Additional judges of the civil court of the 13 city of New York shall be elected in and from the residents of the 14 following counties in the indicated numbers: from the county of New 15 York, three; from the county of Bronx, three; from the county of Kings, 16 three; [and] from the county of Queens, three; and from the county of 17 Richmond, three. Such additional judges shall receive the same compen- 18 sation as the existing judges of the civil court of the city of New York 19 and shall be elected countywide within the city of New York. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided, however, that 21 the positions created by sections one and two of this act shall be 22 filled by election at the November 4, 2025 election, for a term to 23 commence on the first day of January, 2026, as if such vacancy occurred 24 on the effective date of this act. Party nominations shall be made as 25 provided for in section 6-116 and 6-158 of the election law, and the 26 independent nominations shall be made as provided for by subdivision 10 27 of section 6-158 of the election law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06485-01-5